Maryland, session 2026, SB0938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–216.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE PROPERTY” MEANS A MULTIFAMILY PROPERTY THAT:
(I) CONTAINS 15 OR MORE UNITS OF LOW–INCOME
HOUSEHOLDS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0938*

SENATE BILL 938
(II) IS IN THE DEPARTMENT’S LOAN PORTFOLIO.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE AFFORDABLE MULTIFAMILY RENTAL
HOUSING STABILIZATION PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS AN AFFORDABLE MULTIFAMILY RENTAL HOUSING
STABILIZATION PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE TO OWNERS OF PRIVATE SECTOR, AFFORDABLE MULTIFAMILY RENTAL
HOUSING PROPERTIES WITH EMERGENCY OR URGENT CAPITAL REPAIR NEEDS.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE PROPERTY REPAIRS THAT WILL
REDUCE OPERATING COSTS AT THE ELIGIBLE PROPERTY.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD FUNDS TO AN OWNER OF AN ELIGIBLE
PROPERTY FOR EMERGENCY OR URGENT CAPITAL REPAIRS, ONLY IF THE OWNER
PROVIDES DOCUMENTATION INDICATING THE PROPERTY DOES NOT HAVE
ADEQUATE OPERATING OR RESERVE FUNDS AVAILABLE TO PAY FOR THE
NECESSARY REPAIRS.
(G) THE PROGRAM MAY BE USED ONLY TO PROVIDE LOW– OR NO–INTEREST
LOANS OR GRANTS TO PROPERTY OWNERS FOR REPAIRS ON ELIGIBLE PROPERTIES.
(H) FUNDS MAY NOT BE AWARDED FOR REPAIRS AT AN ELIGIBLE PROPERTY
IN EXCESS OF $1,000,000 IN A SINGLE FISCAL YEAR.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ACCEPT APPLICATIONS FOR FUNDS UNDER
THE PROGRAM ON A ROLLING BASIS.
(J) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2031, THE GOVERNOR MAY
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 FOR THE
PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.